Utah statutes.
78A-2-106.   Presiding officer -- Compensation -- Duties.

(1)  The chief justice of the Supreme Court shall serve as the presiding officer of the Judicial Council.  The presiding officer shall receive as additional compensation the sum of $1,000 per annum or fraction thereof for the period served.

(2)  The presiding officer of the Judicial Council shall supervise the courts to ensure uniform adherence to law and to the rules and forms adopted by the council and to promote the proper and efficient functioning of the courts.  The presiding officer of the council may issue orders as necessary to assure compliance with uniform administrative practices.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

